South Dakota, session 2026, SB208.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 10-11-45.1 be AMENDED:
10-11-45.1. The If an aggrieved owner or taxpayer does not prevail in an action
relative to the classification or amount of assessment of property, brought to circuit court
pursuant to this chapter, the circuit court may must award disbursements, including
reasonable attorneys' attorney fees, in an action brought to circuit court pursuant to this
chapter by any appellant relative to the assessment of property, if the appellant does not
prevail in its appeal of the property assessment to the county.
If an aggrieved owner or taxpayer prevails in the reclassification of the property or
obtains an assessment resulting in a reduction of the appealed assessment by at least
twenty percent, the court must award disbursements and reasonable attorney fees to the
owner or taxpayer.
If an aggrieved owner or taxpayer obtains an assessment resulting in a reduction
of the appealed assessment by less than twenty percent, the court may award
disbursements and reasonable attorney fees to the owner or taxpayer.
Section 2. That § 10-11-78 be AMENDED:
10-11-78. On motion, the Supreme Court may award reasonable attorneys' fees
in In an action brought to the Supreme Court of South Dakota, pursuant to this chapter,
against any appellant relative to the classification or amount of assessment of property,
the court, upon motion:
(1) Must award disbursements, including reasonable attorney fees, to the county, if
the appellant aggrieved owner or taxpayer does not prevail in its appeal of the
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.617.19 2 208
reclassification of the property or obtain an assessment. The motion shall be
accompanied by counsel's that is lower than the appealed assessment;
(2) Must award disbursements, including reasonable attorney fees, to an aggrieved
owner or taxpayer that prevails in the reclassification of the property or obtains an
assessment resulting in a reduction of the appealed assessment by at least twenty
percent; or
(3) May award disbursements, including reasonable attorney fees, to an aggrieved
owner or taxpayer that obtains an assessment resulting in a reduction of the
appealed assessment by less than twenty percent.
The attorney for the moving party shall file a verified, itemized statement of costs
incurred, and legal services rendered, with the motion under this section.
Section 3. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 10-11:
Disbursements may not be awarded to an aggrieved owner or taxpayer pursuant
to § 10-11-45.1 or 10-11-78 if the incorrect classification or property assessment value
was a result of the aggrieved owner or taxpayer hindering the ability of the director of
equalization to properly assess the property.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.